Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 5. Educational Assistance

§ 19-9-501.
Educational assistance for national guard members; administration of plan.

The Wyoming national guard educational assistance plan is established to provide assistance for qualified members of the Wyoming national guard who enroll in institutions of higher education in this state. The plan shall be administered by the adjutant general in accordance with the provisions of this article. The adjutant general shall promulgate rules for the administration, implementation and proper utilization of the plan.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 114, § 1.

§ 19-9-502.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Authorized courses” means:

Credit courses which meet undergraduate or graduate degree requirements; and

Credit courses which meet requirements for completion of vocational or technical training for a declared educational objective meeting requirements of rules promulgated pursuant to this article.

“Federal tuition assistance” means any payment made to or on behalf of a member by the federal government for educational assistance, excluding benefits paid pursuant to the Montgomery GI Bill;

“Member” means an active, in good standing, member of the Wyoming national guard;

“Montgomery GI Bill” means the federal Montgomery GI Bill Act of 1984, Public Law 98-525 and subsequent amendments thereto;

“Plan” means the educational assistance plan established under this article;

“Wyoming institution of higher education” or “institution” means a public or private educational institution located within this state and approved for payment of Montgomery GI Bill benefits. “Institution” includes a public or private educational institution offering an accredited degree program in Wyoming through distance education under a partnership agreement with any branch of the United States armed forces;

“Wyoming public institutions of higher education” means the University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 131, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the second sentence in (a)(vi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Federal law. —

The Montgomery GI Bill Act of 1984, Public Law 98-525, is generally codified as 38 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.

§ 19-9-503.
Requirements for educational assistance; assistance payments.

Subject to legislative appropriation and in accordance with the provisions of this article, the adjutant general or his designee, may authorize the payment of higher education tuition and mandatory fees for active members of the Wyoming national guard. To be eligible to participate in the plan members shall:

Have completed basic military training or officer training unless waived by the adjutant general for good cause shown;

Meet the standards for satisfactory participation in the active Wyoming national guard at the beginning of and throughout the entire academic term for which assistance is received;

Be committed through an enlistment contract or other written agreement to membership in the active Wyoming national guard for not less than six (6) years, including initial enlistment and any previous contract or contracts;

Agree in writing to serve in the active Wyoming national guard for two (2) years after the last day of the last academic term for which assistance is received under the plan. This two (2) year period of service may be within the six (6) year commitment period required by paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

Have declared an academic major or educational objective; and

Meet the academic standards specified in this paragraph and otherwise be in good standing as determined by the institution of higher education pursuant to a published policy. Any member receiving educational assistance under the plan who fails to earn a cumulative grade point average at least equivalent to 2.0 on a 4.0 scale shall be ineligible for educational assistance under the plan until the member attains that cumulative grade point average, unless the adjutant general for cause and pursuant to rule and regulation waives the grade point average requirement.

Members meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of this section may receive educational assistance benefit payments as follows:

For authorized courses at a Wyoming public institution of higher education, payment may be made for up to the full cost of tuition and mandatory fees;

For authorized courses at a Wyoming private institution of higher education, payment may be made for the lesser of the actual costs of tuition and mandatory fees or an amount equal to the average resident tuition and mandatory fee charges of all Wyoming public institutions of higher education for an undergraduate student enrolled for twelve (12) semester hours;

Eligible members who are not Wyoming residents may receive benefits as provided in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, but the benefit payment shall not exceed the amount of tuition and mandatory fees which would have been charged if the member were a Wyoming resident;

Payment shall be made directly to the institution after the institution officially certifies that the member has registered;

Payments under the plan together with any federal tuition assistance received by the member shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the tuition and mandatory fees charged.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 114, § 1; 2004, ch. 2, § 1; 2005, ch. 2, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added the proviso in (a)(i).

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(iii), added “including initial enlistment and any previous contract or contracts”; and in (a)(vi), added “unless the adjutant general for cause and pursuant to rule and regulation waives the grade point average requirement.”

§ 19-9-504.
Restrictions; repayment of benefits.

Plan participation and benefit payments shall be subject to the following additional restrictions and qualifications:

The plan may be used to complete only one (1) degree, certificate or other educational objective;

Participation shall be limited to the earlier of:

A period of ten (10) years from the date of the participant’s initial enrollment in the plan; or

The participant’s completion of his one (1) degree, certificate or other educational objective.

Any member receiving educational assistance under the plan who fails to maintain satisfactory participation in the active Wyoming national guard shall repay all educational assistance granted under the plan for that current academic term. The member shall be ineligible for educational assistance under the plan until the adjutant general has determined that the member meets the minimum requirements for satisfactory membership in the Wyoming national guard;

Any member who has received assistance under the plan and who fails to complete the initial six (6) year commitment required by W.S. 19-9-503(a)(iii) and maintain satisfactory participation in the active Wyoming national guard for the two (2) year period required by W.S. 19-9-503(a)(iv), shall repay all educational assistance received under the plan.

The adjutant general may promulgate rules waiving repayment otherwise required under subsection (a) of this section for death, incapacity or other good cause shown. The adjutant general shall immediately transmit all repayments of benefits under the plan to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 114, § 1.